Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1113.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Office of New Pennsylvanians Act.Section 102. Legislative policy and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) According to the United States Census Bureau, in 2018, Pennsylvania ranked 42nd among the 50 states in population growth since 2010, increasing only 0.86%.(2) In 2019, Pennsylvania's 893,167 foreign-born individuals comprised 7% of this Commonwealth's population, an increase of 75.7% since 2000, compared to only 1.2% growth in the United-States-born population.(3) Throughout this Commonwealth's history, immigrants have played a critical role in this Commonwealth's economic, cultural and political growth and success.(4) Policies that promote the attraction, retention and inclusion of immigrants and refugees will help enhance this Commonwealth's economy and diversity, thereby improving the lives of all residents and helping to remove barriers that may undermine immigrants' full potential.(5) Immigrants currently fill skilled positions throughout this Commonwealth's economy and are a vital part of this Commonwealth's economy and tax base. In 2019, 20250HB1113PN1235 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 immigrant business owners in this Commonwealth generated more than $1,700,000,000 in business revenue and immigrant spending power increased to $24,900,000,000.(6) Forty percent of immigrants in this Commonwealth have a bachelor of arts, bachelor of science or graduate degree, compared to 32% of United-States-born Pennsylvanians.(7) Organizations are providing leadership in this Commonwealth's immigrant integration efforts through programs and services that connect newcomers and longtime Pennsylvanians to economic opportunity.(8) It is essential for this Commonwealth's future that skilled, energetic and entrepreneurial immigrants are attracted, retained and integrated. Immigrants help to bolster this Commonwealth's economy and strengthen the social, civic and cultural fabric.(9) States enforce and provide for many services, licenses and educational and economic opportunities that make it imperative to coordinate the work of state agencies, leverage relationships with partner and nonprofit organizations and recommend policies and programs that support immigrant inclusion. Immigrants on the path to full civic and economic participation benefit from a welcoming environment and policies that:(i) Increase access to English language instruction and workforce development and employment.(ii) Reduce exploitation and fraud against immigrants.(iii) Connect new Pennsylvanians to legal services and assist on the path to naturalization.(iv) Provide individuals with meaningful access to 20250HB1113PN1235 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth resources and opportunities regardless of English proficiency.(10) In recognition of these facts and in promotion of the stated goals, the creation of the Office of New Pennsylvanians will help improve the lives and economic prosperity of immigrants and Pennsylvanians generally.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The Advisory Committee to Office of New Pennsylvanians established in section 501."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Office." The Office of New Pennsylvanians established in section 301."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.CHAPTER 3OFFICE OF NEW PENNSYLVANIANSSection 301. Establishment of office.(a) Establishment.--The Office of New Pennsylvanians is established within the department.(b) Administrative services and staff.--(1) The department shall provide administrative services and staff, including counsel and legal staff, to the office and to the advisory committee.(2) The office shall reimburse the department for the cost and expenses of providing the administrative services and staff under paragraph (1). No more than 5% of the funding 20250HB1113PN1235 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated annually to the office shall be used for administrative costs and expenses.Section 302. Powers and duties of office.The office shall:(1) Respond to inquiries from Commonwealth agencies, the media, immigrant-serving organizations and the public about immigration issues in this Commonwealth.(2) Serve as point of contact for Commonwealth licensing boards and the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs.(3) Serve as an information clearinghouse for Commonwealth agencies on immigration-related policy issues and coordinate among agencies as appropriate.(4) Analyze economic, demographic and other trends impacting immigrants in this Commonwealth and make policy recommendations.(5) Ensure that the Commonwealth is gathering relevant data to inform the Commonwealth's policy making on immigrant issues.(6) Develop strategies to attract, retain and integrate immigrants into this Commonwealth.(7) Convene stakeholders in business development and international trade promotion programs to increase capacity to utilize immigrant contributors.(8) Disseminate information to new and prospective immigrant residents of this Commonwealth who wish to invest capital, launch businesses or apply their skills in this Commonwealth.(9) Convene municipal officials to boost peer learning on increasing immigration in cities of the third class 20250HB1113PN1235 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 struggling with population loss and economic decline.(10) Convene college and university officials to foster learning on strategies for immigrant and international student retention.(11) Provide matching grant funds for high-quality immigration and economic development programs that can demonstrate corporate or philanthropic investment.(12) Disseminate information about available services to assist new and prospective immigrant residents of this Commonwealth on the path to naturalization.(13) Disseminate information about legal services available to new Pennsylvanians in civil legal matters, including housing, family, immigration and other matters.(14) Disseminate information about English language instruction and resources available to immigrant residents of this Commonwealth.(15) Convene stakeholders in Commonwealth agencies, immigrant-serving organizations and the public to identify and reduce exploitation and fraud against immigrants.(16) Convene stakeholders in Commonwealth agencies, immigrant-serving organizations and the public to promote race, sex, gender, age, income and LGBTQ equity and to identify and reduce inequities.(17) Develop strategies to provide immigrants with meaningful access to Commonwealth resources and opportunities regardless of their level of English proficiency.(18) Evaluate the success of activities and adjust courses as appropriate.Section 303. Office of New Pennsylvanians Restricted Account.The Office of New Pennsylvanians Restricted Account is 20250HB1113PN1235 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established as a restricted account in the General Fund. Money appropriated by the General Assembly for the office shall be deposited into the restricted account for use by the office to carry out its powers and duties under section 302.CHAPTER 5ADVISORY COMMITTEE TOOFFICE OF NEW PENNSYLVANIANSSection 501. Establishment of advisory committee.The Advisory Committee to Office of New Pennsylvanians is established within the office and shall serve in an advisory capacity to the office in matters regarding immigrants in this Commonwealth. The advisory committee shall be staffed and administered by the office.Section 502. Membership.(a) Public official members.--The advisory committee shall consist of the following members, who shall serve by virtue of their public position:(1) The secretary or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Administration or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Health or a designee.(5) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(6) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(7) The Secretary of Transportation or a designee.(8) The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police or a designee.(9) The Attorney General or a designee from the Office of the Attorney General, Bureau of Consumer Protection.(b) Nongovernmental members.--The advisory committee shall consist of nongovernmental members to be appointed by the 20250HB1113PN1235 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor as follows:(1) Three members from an organization that attracts, retains and integrates immigrants into this Commonwealth's economic, cultural and civic affairs. The advisory committee shall establish a minimum of three regions within this Commonwealth for the purpose of appointing one member from each region.(2) One member from a Pennsylvania chapter of the American Immigration Lawyers Association.(3) One member from an institution of higher education who has a primary focus on immigration issues.(4) One member from the Pennsylvania Chamber of Business and Industry or a similar local advocate for economic improvement.(5) One member with expertise in promoting language access plans.(6) One member from an agency focused on providing English language instruction to speakers of other languages.(7) One member from the Pennsylvania banking sector.(8) One member from a workforce training agency.(9) One member from the health care sector.(10) One member from an agency working to increase immigrants' access to health care services.(11) One member from a human services agency.(12) One member from an agency focused on working with immigrants in matters of tenants' rights.(13) One member from the Pennsylvania Manufacturers' Association.(c) Voting.--(1) All members appointed shall hold voting privileges 20250HB1113PN1235 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on all matters brought for consideration before the advisory committee.(2) A simple majority of members with current appointments to the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. An action adopted by the majority of the members present at a meeting in which there is a quorum shall be deemed to be an act of the advisory committee.(d) Terms.--(1) The terms of the members under subsection (a) shall be concurrent with their holding of the public office.(2) A member appointed under subsection (b) shall serve a three-year term as long as they represent the interest of the membership class for which they were appointed and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(e) Chairperson.--The secretary shall serve as chairperson of the advisory committee.(f) Expenses of members.--Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services. Members who are not employees of State government shall be reimbursed at established Commonwealth rates for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the advisory committee.Section 503. Powers and duties of advisory committee.(a) General rule.--The advisory committee shall:(1) Make recommendations to the Governor and the secretary on policies, procedures, regulations and legislation to attract, retain and integrate immigrants into this Commonwealth's society.(2) Serve as the Governor's liaison to new Pennsylvanians on policies, procedures, regulations and 20250HB1113PN1235 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legislation that affect immigrants, in order to ensure that State government is accessible, accountable and responsive to the needs of immigrants.(3) Serve as a resource to all departments, commissions and agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction to ensure that government entities are cognizant of the needs of immigrants and that the entities' respective services and programs are accessible to immigrants.(4) Work with the office to monitor the practices of Commonwealth agencies relating to the attraction, retention and integration of immigrants in order to maximize the efficiency and accessibility to State government.(5) Perform other duties as the Governor and secretary may assign in planning for services and programs for immigrants.(b) Studies and reports.--The advisory committee may conduct studies and issue reports as necessary on issues affecting immigrants in this Commonwealth.(c) Public hearings.--The advisory committee shall conduct at least one public hearing each year to receive testimony and public comments on improving the attraction, retention and integration of immigrants in this Commonwealth.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the advisory committee from establishing ad hoc work groups or local committees to assist in research and other duties necessary to carry out the mission of the office.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Applicability of other statutes.The following acts shall apply to the office and the advisory 20250HB1113PN1235 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).Section 702. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1113PN1235 - 11 - 12345678910